Florida, session 2026, SB1112.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSubsection (6) of section 448.24, Florida 15 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (8) is added to that 16 section, to read: 17 448.24âDuties and rights.â 18 (6)âA No labor pool may not shall restrict the right of a 19 day laborer to accept a permanent position with a third-party 20 user to whom the laborer is referred for temporary work, or to 21 restrict the right of such a third-party user to offer such 22 employment to an employee of the labor pool. If a third-party 23 user directly employs a laborer for work, a labor pool may not 24 charge the third-party user a placement fee However, nothing 25 shall restrict the labor pool from receiving a reasonable 26 placement fee from the third-party user. 27 (8)âA labor pool that is located, operates, or transacts 28 business in this state shall register annually with the 29 Department of Commerce. The department may adopt rules to 30 implement this subsection. 31 Section 2.âSubsection (4) is added to section 448.25, 32 Florida Statutes, to read: 33 448.25âRemedies; damages; costs.â 34 (4)âIn addition to any damages awarded for an action 35 brought pursuant to this section, the court shall award 36 reasonable attorney fees and costs to the prevailing party. 37 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.